New York, session 2025-2026, A1898.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision 3 of section 11-0901 of the environmental 2 conservation law is amended by adding a new paragraph h to read as 3 follows: 4 h. Wildlife shall not be taken with the use of any toxic ammunition, 5 including lead ammunition. Wildlife shall be taken using only any feder- 6 ally approved nontoxic ammunition. 7 § 2. This act shall take effect on the thirtieth day after it shall 8 have become a law. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD05323-01-5